Maryland, session 2026, HB1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
15–417.
(a) This section applies only in Prince George’s County.
(b) (1) The State’s Attorney’s salary is [$199,000] $250,000.
(2) The State’s Attorney’s salary and expenses shall be paid in equal
semimonthly installments.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the State’s Attorney of Prince George’s County while serving
in a term of office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but the provisions of this
Act concerning the salary or compensation of the State’s Attorney of Prince George’s County
shall take effect at the beginning of the next following term of office. This limitation does
– 1 –

Ch. 584 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
not apply to an individual appointed or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out
an expired term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –